Louisiana, session 2026, HB340.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:2331 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2331. Reassessment
On and after January 1, 1978, all assessments of real property shall be based
on a reassessment of all such real property; and such real property shall be
reappraised at least every four five years thereafter and all assessments of personal
property shall be based on a reassessment of all such personal property, and such
personal property shall be reappraised every year thereafter.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2027.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027, but only if the
proposed amendment of Article VII of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act
which originated as House Bill No. ____ of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-899 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 340